Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-54] Forwarding of charges. When
a person is held for trial by general court-martial the commanding officer
shall, within eight days after the accused is ordered into arrest or
confinement, if practicable, forward the charges, together with the investigation
and allied papers, to the governor. If that is not practicable, the commanding
officer shall report in writing to the governor the reasons for delay. [L 1982,
c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next